Massachusetts, session 194th, H2519.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section XX: There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
fund to be known as the Environmental Public Health Trust Fund (EPHTF), which shall be
administered by the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health. Expenditures from the
fund shall not be subject to appropriation unless otherwise required by law. The fund shall
provide funding for, but not supplant, funds previously designated to support public health
investigations under Section 4 of Chapter 21e of the General Laws. The purpose of the fund
shall be to provide initial and ongoing funding for cancer surveillance and environmental data
collection and to ensure that studies initiated by the department to examine the human health
impact of past and present environmental conditions are completed in as timely a manner as
scientifically feasible. Funds may be provided from the EPHTF to support environmental public
of 2

health activities including but not limited to research, environmental and biologic sample(s)
design and collection modeling, surveys, public engagement and associated administrative costs.
The commissioner shall administer the fund using methods, policies, procedures, standards, and
criteria for the proper and efficient operation of the fund and studies supported by it in a manner
designed to achieve equity, fairness, and efficiency. The secretary of administration and finance,
in consultation with the secretary of health and human services, shall determine annually the
expenses of administering the fund, which shall be charged to the fund. Any health surveillance
and research efforts supported by the EPHTF shall be published electronically on the General
Court website as well as the department’s website and filed with the clerks of the House and
Senate. The commissioner shall report annually itemized expenditures from the fund to the clerks
of the House and Senate and the Senate and House committees on ways and means.
(b) The fund shall consist of: (i) legislative appropriations; (ii) gifts or grants from private
or public sources, (iii) any legislatively authorized transfers approved by the secretary of
administration and finance; and (iv) state and/or federal funds received as a result of cost
recovery efforts associated with health investigations related to state and nationally recognized
hazardous waste for the specific purpose of the fund. Any amounts contained in the fund shall
not revert to the general fund. All interest earned on the amounts in the fund shall be deposited or
retained in the fund. The Comptroller shall pay, without further appropriation, any and all
amounts certified by the Commissioner for payment as provided above.
of 2